Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-741
Judges; when ineligible as candidates for other offices.

No judge shall be eligible as a candidate for any office except a judicial office during the time he or she is serving as a judge.

Laws 1911, c. 37, § 1, p. 204;

R.S.1913, § 1139;

C.S.1922, § 1068;

C.S.1929, § 27-203;

R.S.1943, § 24-203;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 24-203;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 31.